Maryland, session 2026, SB0496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:
(xxvii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, if providing coverage for
the delivery of anesthesia, shall provide coverage for the delivery of anesthesia in
accordance with § 15–862 of the Insurance Article; [and]
(xxviii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, shall provide calcium score
testing in accordance with § 15–863 of the Insurance Article; AND
(XXIX) BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2027, MAY PROVIDE
COMPREHENSIVE COVERAGE FOR THE TREATMENT OF OBESITY UNDER § 15–160 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
15–160.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COMPREHENSIVE COVERAGE FOR THE TREATMENT
OF OBESITY” INCLUDES COVERAGE FOR INTENSIVE BEHAVIORAL THERAPY,
BARIATRIC SURGERY, AND ANY MEDICATION APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL FOOD
AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION WITH AN INDICATION FOR CHRONIC WEIGHT
MANAGEMENT IN PATIENTS WITH OBESITY.

SENATE BILL 496 3
(B) THE PROGRAM MAY PROVIDE COMPREHENSIVE COVERAGE FOR THE
TREATMENT OF OBESITY.
(C) THE PROGRAM MAY UNDERTAKE UTILIZATION MANAGEMENT TO
DETERMINE THE MEDICAL NECESSITY AND APPROPRIATENESS FOR TREATMENT OF
OBESITY UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE DETERMINATIONS ARE MADE IN THE SAME
MANNER AS DETERMINATIONS ARE MADE FOR THE TREATMENT OF ANY OTHER
ILLNESS, CONDITION, OR DISORDER COVERED BY THE PROGRAM.
(D) IF THE DEPARTMENT ELECTS TO PROVIDE COMPREHENSIVE COVERAGE
FOR THE TREATMENT OF OBESITY UNDER THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
PROVIDE NOTICE TO PROGRAM RECIPIENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Department of
Health may apply to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for a State plan
amendment that authorizes the State to provide comprehensive coverage for the treatment of
obesity.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before November 1,
2027, the Maryland Department of Health shall report to the Senate Finance Committee,
the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the House Health Committee, and the House
Appropriations Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
on whether the Maryland Medical Assistance Program has begun to provide comprehensive
coverage for the treatment of obesity as authorized under § 15–160 of the Health – General
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, and if not, why the Department has not begun
to provide coverage.
SECTION 3. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.